GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/lex-sport.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     sport teams names
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    ITALIAN
!#
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller, G. Depau
!#
!# CREATED:	11 July-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!# [E] http:publications.europa.eu/code/it/it-5000500.htm
!# [W] Wikipedia
!# ============================================================================
Multichar_Symbols

+Prop +Adj +NAdj

+Sport
+Postmod +Premod +Acron

+Sg +Pl
+Masc +Fem +FSG +MSG

! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space


LEXICON ROOT 

A.C.+Prop+Sport+Acron+Premod		#;
A.C.+Prop+Sport+Acron+Postmod		#;
A.S.+Prop+Sport+Acron+Premod		#;
S.S.+Prop+Sport+Acron+Premod		#;
Calcio+Prop+Sport+Premod		#;
F.C.+Prop+Sport+Acron+Premod		#;
F.C.+Prop+Sport+Acron+Postmod		#;
Football% Club+Prop+Sport+Acron+Postmod	#;
Polisportiva+Prop+Sport+Premod		#;

!--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# football teams



Ajax% Amsterdam+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Ajax+Prop+Sport				MSG;
Albinoleffe+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Almeria+Prop+Sport			MSG;	
Anderlecht+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Arezzo+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Ascoli+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Atalanta+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Athletic% Bilbao+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Auxerre+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Avellino+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Bari+Prop+Sport				MSG;
Bayer+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Bayern+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Benfica+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Betis+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Birmingham% City+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Blackburn+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Boca% Juniors+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Bochum+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Bologna+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Bolton+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Bordeaux+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Borussia+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Brescia+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Bromwich+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Caen+Prop+Sport				MSG;
Cagliari+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Catania+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Catanzaro+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Celtic% Glasgow+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Celtic+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Cesena+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Chievo% Verona+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Chievo+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Colo% Colo+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Cottbus+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Cremonese+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Crotone+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Deportivo% La% Coruna+Prop+Sport	MSG;
Derby% County+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Duisburg+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Eintracht% Francoforte+Prop+Sport	MSG;
Eintracht+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Empoli+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Espanyol+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Feyenoord+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Fiorentina+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Frosinone+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Genoa+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Grosseto+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Hannover% 96+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Hansa% Rostock+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Heerenveen+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Hertha% Berlino+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Internazionale+Prop+Sport		FSG;
Inter+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Italia+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Juventus+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Juve+Prop+Sport				FSG;
Karslruhe+Prop+Sport			MSG;
La% Gantoise+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Lazio+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Le% Mans+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Lecce+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Lens+Prop+Sport				MSG;
Levante+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Lilla+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Lione+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Livorno+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Lorient+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Maiorca+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Manchester% Utd+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Mantova+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Olympique% Marsiglia+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Marsiglia+Prop+Sport			MSG;
OM+Prop+Sport				MSG;
Messina+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Metz+Prop+Sport				MSG;
Milan+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Modena+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Monaco+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Murcia+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Nancy+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Napoli+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Newcastle+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Nizza+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Norimberga+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Olympiakos% Pireo+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Olympiakos+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Palermo+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Paris% Saint% Germain+Prop+Sport	MSG;
PSG+Prop+Sport				MSG;
Penarol% Montevideo+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Parma+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Perugia+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Pescara+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Piacenza+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Pisa+Prop+Sport				MSG;
Porto+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Psv% Eindhoven+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Psv+Prop+Sport				MSG;
Queen's% Park% Rangers+Prop+Sport	MSG;
QPR+Prop+Sport				MSG;
Racing% Santander+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Glasgow% Rangers+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Rangers+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Ravenna+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Reading+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Real+Prop+Sport				MSG;
Recreativo% Huelva+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Reggina+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Rennes+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Rimini+Prop+Sport			MSG;
River% Plate+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Roma+Prop+Sport				FSG;
Saint% Etienne+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Salernitana+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Sampdoria+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Real% Saragozza+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Saragozza+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Schalke% 04+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Schalke+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Siena+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Sochaux+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Spezia+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Sporting% Lisbona+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Sporting+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Standard% Liegi+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Standard+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Strasburgo+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Ternana+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Tolosa+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Torino+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Tottenham+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Treviso+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Triestina+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Udinese+Prop+Sport			FSG;
Valencia+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Valenciennes+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Venezia+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Verona+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Vicenza+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Werder+Prop+Sport			MSG;
West% Ham% United+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Wigan+Prop+Sport			MSG;




Real% Madrid+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Villarreal+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Barcellona+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Atletico% Madrid+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Siviglia+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Racing% Santander+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Maiorca+Prop+Sport			MSG;
U.D.% Almería+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Almería+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Deportivo% La% Coruna+Prop+Sport	MSG;
Valencia+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Athletic% Bilbao+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Espanyol+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Betis% Siviglia+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Getafe+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Valladolid% +Prop+Sport			MSG;
Recreativo% de% Huelva+Prop+Sport	MSG;
Osasuna+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Saragozza+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Real% Murcia+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Levante% U.D.+Prop+Sport		MSG;



Arsenal+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Aston% Villa+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Blackburn% Rovers+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Bolton% Wanderers+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Chelsea+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Everton+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Fulham+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Hull% City+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Liverpool+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Manchester% City+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Manchester% United+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Middlesbrough+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Newcastle% United+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Portsmouth+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Stoke% City+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Sunderland+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Tottenham% Hotspur+Prop+Sport		MSG;
West% Bromwich% Albion+Prop+Sport	MSG;
West% Ham+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Wigan% Athletic+Prop+Sport		MSG;




SG% Hoffenheim+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Amburgo+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Arminia% Bielefeld+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Bayer% Leverkusen+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Bayern% Monaco+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Borussia% Dortmund+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Colonia+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Eintracht% Francoforte+Prop+Sport	MSG;
Energie% Cottbus+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Hannover+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Hertha% Berlino+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Karlsruher% SC+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Moenchengladbach+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Schalke% 04+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Stoccarda+Prop+Sport			MSG;
VfL% Bochum+Prop+Sport			MSG;
Werder% Brema+Prop+Sport		MSG;
Wolfsburg+Prop+Sport			MSG;




!# continuation classes
LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;
LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;
